Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.77.008

Student loan advocate account.

The student loan advocate account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purpose of covering the costs of administering the student loan advocate program created in RCW 28B.77.007. Only the executive director of the council or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditure.

[ 2018 c 62 s 5.]

NOTES:

Application—Short title—2018 c 62: See RCW 31.04.905 and 31.04.906.